District of Columbia statutes.
24-251.03

Purposes of furloughs; furloughs over 12 hours.

(a)

The Mayor, or his designated agent, may grant a furlough, except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, to any eligible resident:

(1)

In order to visit the bedside of a dying relative, or to attend the funeral of a relative, in the Washington metropolitan area;

(2)

Upon the recommendation of the institutional review committee, in order to call upon prospective employers in the Washington metropolitan area, enroll in an educational institution or program, obtain suitable housing prior to release, or to finalize parole supervision plans with an officer or employee of the Department; or

(3)

Upon the recommendation of the institutional review committee, to participate in family and approved community, religious, or educational, social, civic, and recreational activities, when it is determined that such participation will directly facilitate the transition from life in the facility or institution to life in the community.

(b)

The Mayor, or his designated agent, may grant a furlough for the purposes specified in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this section outside of the Washington metropolitan area, so long as such furlough does not exceed 72 hours.

(c)

The Mayor, or his designated agent, may grant a furlough to an eligible resident for longer than 12 hours, but for no longer than 72 hours, where he finds that, based on a report from the institutional review committee, such eligible resident:

(1)

Has demonstrated complete institutional adjustment;

(2)

Is strongly motivated to benefit from the program;

(3)

Is considered to have exceptional potential for rehabilitation; and

(4)

Will not, while on furlough, constitute a threat or danger to the community.

(d)

For the purposes of this section, the term “relative” means a spouse, child (including a step-child, adopted child, or child to whom the resident, though not a natural parent, has acted in the place of a parent), parent (including a person who, though not a natural parent, has acted in the place of a parent), brother, or sister.

(e)

In the event any eligible resident applies for a furlough for 1 of the reasons specified in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this section, verification of the death or seriousness of the illness, as the case may be, of the relative must be obtained from the attending physician, hospital physician, or funeral home director (as applicable), before such furlough may be granted.

Apr. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 1-130, § 4, 23 DCR 9694
June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-275, § 17, 44 DCR 1408
This section is referenced in § 24-251.01.
1981 Ed., § 24-483.
1973 Ed., § 24-483.